Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 4 County and Municipal Hospital Authorities

Cross references.

Use of excess proceeds of bonds issued by county or municipal corporation to match state and federal contributions to build and equip hospital in such county or municipal corporation, §

36-60-7

.

Law reviews.

For article noting the exclusion of public authorities from the Georgia Administrative Procedure Act, see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 269 (1965).

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

For article, “Tackling the Social Determinants of Health:
A Central for Providers,” see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 217 (2017).

For note, “Bearing Hospital Tax Breaks:
How Nonprofits Benefit from Your Surprise Medical Bills,” see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 809 (2019).

31-7-70.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Hospital Authorities Law.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1801, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rural Hospital Assistance Act, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Health Planning, Chapter 111-2-4.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

31-7-71.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Area of operation” means the area within the city or county activating an authority. Such term shall also mean any other city or county in which the authority wishes to operate, provided the governing authorities and the board of any hospital authorities of such city and county request or approve such operation.

“Authority” or “hospital authority” means any public corporation created by this article.

“Governing body” means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing body of a city or county.

“Participating units” or “participating subdivisions” means any two or more counties, or any two or more municipalities, or a combination of any county and any municipality acting together for the creation of an authority.

“Project” includes the acquisition, construction, and equipping of hospitals, health care facilities, dormitories, office buildings, clinics, housing accommodations, nursing homes, rehabilitation centers, extended care facilities, and other public health facilities for the use of patients and officers and employees of any institution under the supervision and control of any hospital authority or leased by the hospital authority for operation by others to promote the public health needs of the community and all utilities and facilities deemed by the authority necessary or convenient for the efficient operation thereof. Such term may also include any such institutions, utilities, and facilities located outside the city or county in which the authority is located, provided that the acquisition, construction, equipping, and operation thereof is requested or approved by the governing bodies of such city and county in which the project is located and by the board of any hospital authorities located within such city and county or provided that the acquisition, construction, equipping, and operation is to be located in the area of operation of the authority.

“Resolution” means the resolution or ordinance to be adopted by governing bodies pursuant to which authorities are established.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1802, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 683, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 190, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1391, §§ 1, 2.

31-7-72.
Creation of hospital authority in each county and municipality.

There is created in and for each county and municipal corporation of the state a public body corporate and politic to be known as the “hospital authority” of such county or city, which shall consist of a board of not less than five nor more than nine members to be appointed by the governing body of the county or municipal corporation of the area of operation for staggered terms as specified by resolution of the governing body. The number of members of any hospital authority as of March 1, 1984, may be increased by not more than two additional members by the adoption of a resolution of the members of the hospital authority, and such additional members shall be appointed through the same process used for filling vacancies which was in effect for such hospital authority on January 1, 1984. Whenever an appointment to fill a vacancy on the board of any hospital authority is made, either for an unexpired term or a full term, consideration shall be given as to whether a licensed doctor of medicine or registered nurse currently serves on such authority. If no licensed doctor of medicine or registered nurse currently serves on such authority, then consideration shall be given to the nomination and choice of a licensed doctor of medicine or a registered nurse to fill such vacancy. No authority created under this Code section shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this Code section until the governing body of the area of operation shall, by proper resolution, declare that there is need for an authority to function in such county or municipal corporation. Copies of a resolution so adopted and any resolution adopted by the governing body providing for filling vacancies in the membership of the authority or making any changes in membership shall be filed with the department.

Appointments to fill vacancies on the board of any hospital authority activated on or after March 15, 1964, for either an unexpired or full term as fixed in the original resolution or ordinance creating the authority, shall be made as follows:

The governing body of the area of operation shall submit a list of three eligible persons to the board of the hospital authority;

The board at its next regular meeting shall either select one of the three persons named in such list or decline to select any of the persons named in the list. If the board declines to select any of the persons named on the list, it shall so notify the governing body; and

Upon receipt of notification that the board has declined to select any of the persons named in the governing body’s list, the governing body shall submit a second list of three eligible persons, no one of whom was named on the first list, to the board of the hospital authority. The board at its next regular meeting after receipt of the second list shall select one of the three persons named in the second list.

Appointments to fill vacancies for either an unexpired or full term on the boards of all hospital authorities in existence prior to March 15, 1964, shall be governed by the terms of a resolution adopted prescribing the manner by which vacancies are filled, unless changed by local legislation or constitutional amendment.

Any two or more counties or any two or more municipalities or any county or municipality, or a combination of any county and any municipality, by a like resolution or ordinance of their respective governing bodies, may authorize the exercise of the powers provided for in this article by an authority. The membership of such authority affected by like resolutions of the respective governing bodies of any two or more of the governing bodies of the participating units shall be not less than five nor more than 15 members, the terms and distribution of members between the participating units to be provided for by the resolutions adopted by the governing bodies of the participating units, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection. The resolutions of the governing bodies of participating units acting together for the creation of an authority may be amended by the governing bodies of the participating units from time to time. Where the governing bodies of participating units have acted together for the creation of an authority under this subsection and where at least one of those participating units is a county having a population of 35,000 or less according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census, the method of filling vacancies upon such authority may be changed only by local Act of the General Assembly and, when so changed, shall be governed by that local Act.

On and after July 1, 2021, no person shall serve as a member of a hospital authority for more than three consecutive terms, or 12 years, whichever is longer.

This paragraph shall only apply to joint hospital authorities established pursuant to this subsection which operate or lease a hospital containing more than 900 licensed beds.

Nothing in this Code section is intended to invalidate any of the acts of existing boards of authorities. Hospital authorities shall be granted the same exemptions and exclusions from taxes as are now granted to cities and counties for the operation of facilities similar to facilities to be operated by hospital authorities as provided for under this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection or any other law to the contrary, any real property in which 50 percent or more of the floor space thereof, excluding halls, corridors, and public spaces, is rented or leased by persons, firms, or corporations engaged in or conducting a private for profit business or profession owned by a hospital authority which is located in a county having a population of 50,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census or owned by any subsidiary or affiliate thereof and which hospital authority or subsidiary or affiliate thereof operates a hospital containing more than 100 beds, shall be subject to all state, county, and municipal ad valorem taxes in the same manner as other private property.

The project or projects of an authority created by two or more counties, or two or more municipalities, or a combination of any county and any municipality may be located outside of the area of the sponsor’s operation when it is determined by the trustees that this will best serve the purposes of the facility and provided it is located within the area of service and within 12 miles of the hospital location or within 12 miles of the sponsoring county or municipality, whichever is farther.

Hospital authorities created pursuant to this Code section shall have perpetual existence.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1141, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 88-1803, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 347, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1974, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 585, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1994, p. 781, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 900, § 3; Ga. L. 2021, p. 662, § 1/HB 370.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, designated the existing provision of subsection (d) as paragraph (d)(1), added the exception at the end of the second sentence in paragraph (d)(1), and added paragraph (d)(2).

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to insurance, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 143 (1998).

For annual survey of real property law, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2016).

31-7-72.1.
Merger of hospital authorities.

A hospital authority activated for a county pursuant to Code Section 31-7-73 may be merged with a hospital authority activated for that county under Code Section 31-7-72 upon compliance with this Code section and approval by resolution of the governing authority of the county in which the authorities are located. A majority of the board of each such hospital authority must approve such merger by a resolution which is adopted by each such board and is filed with the department. That resolution shall set forth:

The name of each hospital authority planning to merge and the name of the surviving hospital authority into which each plans to merge; and

The terms and conditions of the planned merger.

The merger authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section shall not become effective until the governing authority of the county of operation of the merging hospitals appoints the members of the board of the surviving hospital authority by proper resolution and files copies of such resolution with the department. The governing authority is not required but is authorized to appoint as a member of the surviving hospital authority any member of a hospital authority planning to merge. The board of the surviving hospital shall consist of not more than 15 members with initial appointments for such staggered terms as provided in the resolution of the county governing authority. Appointments to fill vacancies for either an unexpired or full term shall thereafter be filled as authorized for an authority under subsection (c) of Code Section 31-7-72. The surviving hospital authority shall be in all other respects a hospital authority created under Code Section 31-7-72.

A county whose hospital authorities have merged under the authority of this Code section shall not thereafter be prohibited from activating a hospital authority under Code Section 31-7-73.

When a merger under this Code section takes effect:

Each hospital authority party to the merger merges into the surviving hospital authority and the separate existence of each such hospital authority except the surviving hospital authority ceases;

The ownership of and authority to operate the hospitals owned by each hospital authority and the title to all real estate and other property owned by each hospital authority party to the merger is vested in the surviving hospital authority without reversion or impairment subject to any and all conditions to which the property was subject prior to the merger;

The surviving hospital authority has all liabilities and obligations of each hospital authority party to the merger; and

A proceeding pending against any hospital authority party to the merger may be continued as if the merger did not occur or the surviving hospital authority may be substituted in the proceeding for the hospital authority whose existence ceased.

It is declared by the General Assembly of Georgia that in the exercise of the power specifically granted to them by this Code section, hospital authorities are acting pursuant to state policy and shall be immune from antitrust liability to the same degree and extent as enjoyed by the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-72.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1020, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, a comma was deleted preceding “the title” in paragraph (d)(2).

31-7-73.
Creation of additional hospital authority in counties with large populations.

Any other provision of this article to the contrary notwithstanding, there is created in and for each county of this state having a population of 100,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census a public body corporate and politic to be known as the “ _______________ Hospital Authority.” Each such hospital authority shall be a separate entity and in addition to the hospital authority of each county of this state created pursuant to Code Section 31-7-72.

Each such additional hospital authority shall consist of a board of not less than five nor more than nine members to be appointed by the governing body of each such county for staggered terms, as specified by resolution of the governing body. No hospital authority created under this Code section shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this Code section until the governing body of each such county declares by proper resolution that there is a need for an additional hospital authority to function within such county, which resolution shall also determine and declare that such hospital authority is being created pursuant to this Code section and shall adopt a designation for the hospital authority so as to reflect that it is a separate and distinct entity from the hospital authority created pursuant to Code Section 31-7-72. A copy of such resolution shall be filed with the department. Copies of any resolutions adopted by the governing body of the county for the purpose of filling vacancies in the membership of the hospital authority or for making any changes in membership shall also be filed with the department.

Appointments to fill vacancies on the board of any such hospital authority shall be made as provided in Code Section 31-7-72.

All provisions of this article, including, but not limited to, the rights, powers, duties, obligations, and exemptions from taxation provided thereby for hospital authorities shall apply to the additional hospital authorities created pursuant to this Code section and the hospital authorities so created shall, in all respects, to the extent applicable for the purposes of this chapter, be treated as though they had been created pursuant to Code Section 31-7-72.

It is declared that this Code section shall be cumulative of and supplemental to Code Section 31-7-72 and not in lieu thereof. It is expressly provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall invalidate or abrogate any of the actions or obligations of existing hospital authorities created pursuant to Code Section 31-7-72 and further that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as adversely affecting the rights and interests of the holders or owners of any bonds, certificates, or obligations now or hereafter issued by such existing hospital authorities.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1803.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 683, § 2.

31-7-74.
Residency requirement; officers; compensation; rules and regulations.

The members of a hospital authority shall be residents of the participating units comprising the authority. The requirement of residence shall not apply to authorities activated under subsection (d) of Code Section 31-7-72, provided they are selected from within the area of service and within 12 miles of the hospital location or within 12 miles of the sponsoring county or municipality, whichever is farther. The members shall elect one of their number as chair and another as vice chair and shall also elect a secretary-treasurer, who need not be a member. The members shall receive no compensation for their services, either as members or as employees of the authority but may be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties or, in the alternative, the members may elect to be reimbursed for such expenses on a per diem basis in an amount not to exceed $100.00 per meeting and the total amount not to exceed $100.00 per month. The authority shall make rules and regulations for its governance and may delegate to one or more of its members, officers, agents, or employees such powers and duties as may be deemed necessary and proper.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 4; Code 1933, § 88-1804, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 347, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1317, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 874, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1404, § 2.

31-7-74.1.
Definitions; disclosures required; prohibited transactions; exceptions; sanctioning; sanctioning of members violating prohibition; authorization of authority to make stricter rules; preemption of other laws; applicability.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Family” means spouse, child, or sibling.

“Financial interest” means the direct or indirect ownership of any assets or stock of any business.

“Substantial interest” means the direct or indirect ownership of more than 25 percent of the assets or stock of any business.

“Transact business” or “transact any business” or “transaction” means any sale or lease of any personal property, real property, or services on behalf of oneself or on behalf of any third party as an agent, broker, dealer, or representative.

Each member of a hospital authority shall disclose upon his or her selection as a member, and at least annually thereafter, the following described interests and relationships:

Any financial interest held by the member or the member’s family, or held by an entity in which the member or the member’s family owns a financial interest, in any health care provider, any managed care provider or network, or any entity which sells products or services to the authority;

Any position held by the member or the member’s family as an officer, director, or employee of a hospital, hospital holding company, other health care provider, or managed care network; and

Any contract which exists between the member or the member’s family, or any entity in which the member or the member’s family owns a financial interest, and the authority, including, but not limited to, supply contracts, service contracts, and leases.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, no authority member, no hospital chief executive, and no hospital system chief executive officer shall, for such person or for any entity in which such person or such person’s family has a substantial interest, transact any business with such authority.

The prohibition of subsection (c) of this Code section shall not apply to:

Any relationship whereunder a person licensed under Title 43 provides to such authority or its medical facilities any services;

Any officer or employee of a trust company or bank which has been selected to be the depository of the funds of such nonprofit corporation; or

Any transaction by a board member or a board member’s family where the amount of all transactions between the parties is $1,000.00 or less in any one year.

A transaction in which any member of an authority has a financial interest or relationship described in subsection (b) of this Code section which does not constitute a substantial interest may be approved if, at the time of such approval:

The material facts of the transaction and the member’s financial interest are disclosed or known to the authority’s board;

The interested member is absent from any portion of a meeting which discusses or votes upon said transaction; and

The members approving the transaction in good faith reasonably believe that the transaction is fair to the authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, a transaction in which any member of an authority has a substantial interest may be approved if:

The transaction was submitted to a competitive process for requests for proposals, which includes but is not limited to consideration of all submitted proposals for price, quality, and appropriateness; and

Notice of the transaction was published in the official county organ not less than two weeks prior to the approval of the board;

Opportunity for public comment concerning the proposed transaction was provided at a meeting of the board;

At the time of approval, the members approving the transaction in good faith reasonably believe that the transaction is fair and is in the best interests of the authority; and

The interested member is absent from any portion of a meeting which discusses or votes upon said transaction.

For purposes of this Code section, a transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the members on the board present and voting who have no financial interest in the transaction. A majority, but not less than two, of all the noninterested members on the board present and voting constitutes a quorum for purposes of action that complies with this Code section.

Any action by an authority which is taken in compliance with the applicable requirements of this Code section may not be enjoined, set aside, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against the authority or any member or officer on the ground of a member’s or officer’s interest in such transaction. For any action by an authority not in compliance with such requirements, any member knowingly violating such requirements shall be immediately sanctioned, which may include, but not be limited to, reprimand, temporary suspension, or permanent removal from the authority after appropriate notice and hearing. The entity having appointed such member shall have the authority to impose any sanction.

Nothing in this Code section shall prevent an authority from having stricter rules relating to interests or relationships than what is provided in this Code section.

To the extent the provisions of this Code section conflict with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this Code section shall govern.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply to those individuals serving as members of an authority who are appointed or reappointed on or after July 1, 1997. However, this Code section shall apply to all members of an authority, regardless of appointment date, serving on or after July 1, 1998.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-74.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1404, § 3.

31-7-74.2.
Oath to be taken by members of hospital authority.

Each member of a hospital authority shall take in the presence of an officer authorized to administer same the following oath:

I,
_______________ , citizen of
_______________
_______________
County, Georgia, do solemnly swear that I will, to the best of my ability, without favor or affection to any person and without any unauthorized financial gain or compensation to myself, faithfully and fairly discharge all of the duties and responsibilities that devolve upon me as a member of
_______________
Hospital Authority, during the term of my service as such member.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-74.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1404, § 3.

31-7-74.3.
Sale or lease by hospital authority; hearing required; factors to be considered at hearing; applicability; requirements for lease.

No hospital which is owned by a hospital authority may be sold or leased to a for profit entity, a not for profit entity, or another hospital authority unless a public hearing regarding such action is held in the county where such hospital is located at least 60 days prior to such sale or lease becoming effective. In the event there is more than one participating unit for an authority, a hearing shall be held in each participating unit’s county at least 60 days prior to the sale or lease becoming effective. The hospital authority must publish notice of the hearing at least three times, with the first such notice appearing at least 60 days prior to the hearing in the legal organ of each participating unit. At each such public hearing, the hospital authority shall describe, discuss, or otherwise disclose:

The reasonably foreseeable adverse and beneficial effects of such lease or sale upon health care in the service area of the hospitals to be leased or sold, and, for purposes of this paragraph, the service area shall include the county in which the hospital is located and each adjoining county;

A financial statement indicating the estimated value of the total assets and liabilities to be transferred or received in the transaction; however, if the value of any individual asset exceeds $100,000.00, a description and the value of such assets shall be indicated on the financial statement; and

The resumes of the top five executive officers who will manage the facility after it is sold or leased.

This subsection shall not apply to any transaction which is subject to the provisions of Code Section 31-7-89.1.

No hospital which is owned by a hospital authority may be leased to another person, corporation, or business entity, other than as provided in paragraphs (23) and (24) of Code Section 31-7-75, unless such lease requires that:

At least one member of the hospital authority will serve as a full voting member upon the governing body or local board of the business entity exercising control and management powers over the leased hospital; and

The governing body or local board of the business entity exercising control and management powers over the leased hospital submits to the governing authority of each county in which the hospital is located, within 90 days after the close of the calendar year or that entity’s fiscal year, a complete and detailed financial statement for that entity.

Provisions of a lease required by subsection (b) of this Code section may not be renegotiated or otherwise altered or amended for the duration of such lease.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-74.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1404, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 31.

31-7-74.4.
Board members deemed directors upon sale or lease of hospital.

Members on the board of a hospital authority at the time of a sale or lease of a hospital owned by such hospital authority shall be deemed directors and subject to the provisions of Part 6 of Article 8 of Chapter 3 of Title 14, relating to conflicting interest transactions with respect to the proceeds of such sale or lease.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-74.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 183, § 2/HB 321.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2019.